Texas statutes.
ESTATES CODE

TITLE 2. ESTATES OF DECEDENTS; DURABLE POWERS OF ATTORNEY

SUBTITLE B. PROCEDURAL MATTERS

CHAPTER 56. CHANGE AND RESIGNATION OF RESIDENT AGENT OF PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE FOR SERVICE OF PROCESS

Sec. 56.001. CHANGE OF RESIDENT AGENT. (a) A personal representative of an estate may change the representative's resident agent to accept service of process in a probate proceeding or other action relating to the estate by filing with the court in which the probate proceeding is pending a statement titled "Designation of Successor Resident Agent" that states the names and addresses of:

(1) the representative;

(2) the resident agent; and

(3) the successor resident agent.

(b) The designation of a successor resident agent takes effect on the date a statement under Subsection (a) is filed with the court.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680, Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 56.002. RESIGNATION OF RESIDENT AGENT. (a) A resident agent of a personal representative may resign as resident agent by giving notice to the representative and filing with the court in which the probate proceeding is pending a statement titled "Resignation of Resident Agent" that states:

(1) the name of the representative;

(2) the representative's address most recently known by the resident agent;

(3) that notice of the resignation has been given to the representative and the date that notice was given; and

(4) that the representative has not designated a successor resident agent.

(b) The resident agent shall send, by a qualified delivery method, a copy of a resignation statement filed under Subsection (a) to:

(1) the personal representative at the address most recently known by the resident agent; and

(2) each party in the case or the party's attorney or other designated representative of record.

(c) The resignation of a resident agent takes effect on the date the court enters an order accepting the resignation. A court may not enter an order accepting the resignation unless the resident agent complies with this section.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680, Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 205 (S.B. 1373), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2023.